Washington statutes.
RCW 24.28.010

Manner of incorporating a grange.

Any grange of the patrons of husbandry, desiring hereafter to incorporate, may incorporate and become bodies politic in this state, by filing in the office of the secretary of state of Washington in accordance with Article 2 of chapter 23.95 RCW, a certificate or article subscribed and acknowledged by not less than five members of such grange and by the master of the Washington state grange embodying:

(1) The name of such grange and the place of holding its meetings.

(2) What elective officers the said grange will have, when such officers shall be elected; how, and by whom, the business of the grange shall be conducted or managed, and what officers shall join in the execution of any contract by such grange to give force and effect in accordance with the usages of the order of the patrons of husbandry; such articles shall be subscribed by the master of such grange attested by the secretary, with the seal of the grange.

(3) A copy of the bylaws of such grange shall also be filed in the said office of the secretary of state.

(4) The names of all such officers at the time of filing the application, and the time for which they may be respectively elected. When such articles shall be filed, such grange shall be a body politic and corporate, with all the incidents of a corporation, subject nevertheless to the laws and parts of laws now in force or hereafter to be passed regulating corporations.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9119; 1981 c 302 s 13; 1959 c 207 s 1; 1875 p 97 s 1; RRS s 3901. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1875 c 97 s 2, part, now codified in RCW 24.28.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.